Alaska statutes. Title 21. Insurance.
Article 2. Membership.

Sec. 21.84.025.
Qualifications for membership.

A society shall specify in its laws or rules

eligibility standards for each class of membership, but, if benefits are provided on the lives of children, the minimum age for adult membership shall be set at not less than 15 years of age and not more than 21 years of age;

the process for admission to membership for each membership class; and

the rights and privileges of each membership class; however, only benefit members may vote on the management of the insurance affairs of the society.

A society may also admit social members, but the social members may not have a voice or vote in the management of the insurance affairs of the society.

A society may organize and operate lodges for children under the minimum age for adult membership. Membership and initiation in local lodges may not be required of children, nor may children have a voice or vote in the management of the society.

Membership rights in the society are personal to the member and are not assignable.

History.

(§ 2 ch 96 SLA 1997)

Sec. 21.84.030.
Annual license. [Repealed, § 36 ch 96 SLA 1997.]

Sec. 21.84.035.
Location of office; meetings; communications to members; grievance procedures.

The principal office of a domestic society must be located in this state. The meetings of the supreme governing body of a society may be held in a state, district, province, or territory in which the society has at least one subordinate lodge or in another location as determined by the supreme governing body. All business transacted at the meetings is as valid in all respects as if the meetings were held in this state. The minutes of the proceedings of the supreme governing body and of the board of directors must conform to language requirements for documents filed under AS

21.84.070

.

A society may provide in its laws for an official publication in which any notice, report, or statement required by law to be given to members, including notice of election, may be published. If published in the official publication, required reports, notices, and statements shall be printed conspicuously. If the records of a society show that two or more members have the same mailing address, an official publication mailed to one member is considered to be mailed to all members at the same address unless a member requests a separate copy.

A synopsis of the society’s annual statement providing an explanation of the facts concerning the condition of the society shall be printed not later than June 1 of each year and mailed to each benefit member of the society or published in the society’s official publication.

A society may provide in its laws or rules for grievance or complaint procedures for members.

History.

(§ 3 ch 96 SLA 1997)

Sec. 21.84.040.
Foreign or alien society. [Repealed, § 36 ch 96 SLA 1997.]

Sec. 21.84.045.
No personal liability; indemnity.

The officers and members of the supreme governing body or a subordinate body of a society are not personally liable for benefits provided by a society.

A society shall indemnify and reimburse a person for expenses reasonably incurred by, and liabilities imposed upon, that person in connection with an action, suit, or proceeding, or threat of an action, suit, or proceeding, whether civil, criminal, administrative, or investigative, in which the person is involved by reason of the fact of service in the capacity of a director, officer, employee, or agent of the society or service in any capacity in a firm, corporation, or organization at the request of the society. However, a society may not indemnify or reimburse a person in connection with a matter in an action, suit, or proceeding, or threat of an action, suit, or proceeding, that has been made the subject of a compromise settlement, or in which the person is adjudged to be guilty of breach of a duty as a director, officer, employee, or agent of the society, unless the person acted in good faith for a purpose the person reasonably believed to be in or not opposed to the best interests of the society, and, in a criminal action or proceeding, in addition, had no reasonable cause to believe that the person’s conduct constituted a violation of a criminal law of this state or another jurisdiction. The determination of whether the conduct of the person meets the standard required to justify indemnification and reimbursement may be made by the supreme governing body or the board of directors through a majority vote of a quorum consisting of persons who were not parties to the action, suit, or proceeding or by a court of competent jurisdiction. The termination of an action, suit, or proceeding by judgment, order, settlement, conviction, or plea of no contest as to the person does not in itself create a conclusive presumption that the person did not meet the standard of conduct required to justify indemnification and reimbursement. The right of indemnification and reimbursement is not exclusive of other rights to which a person may be entitled as a matter of law and inures to the benefit of the person’s heirs, executors, and administrators.

A society may purchase and maintain insurance on behalf of a person who is or was a director, officer, employee, or agent of the society, or who is or was serving at the request of the society as a director, officer, employee, or agent of a firm, corporation, or organization, against a liability asserted against the person and incurred by the person arising out of that capacity, whether or not the society would have the power to indemnify the person against that liability under this section.

A director, officer, employee, member, or volunteer of a society serving without compensation is not liable, and no cause of action may be brought against the person for damages resulting from the exercise of judgment or discretion in connection with the duties or responsibilities of the person for the society unless the act or omission involved reckless or intentional misconduct.

History.

(§ 4 ch 96 SLA 1997)

Sec. 21.84.050.
Suspension, revocation, or refusal of license of foreign or alien society. [Repealed, § 36 ch 96 SLA 1997.]

Sec. 21.84.055.
Waiver.

The laws of the society may provide that a subordinate body or its subordinate officers or members may not waive any provision of the laws of the society. The provision is binding on the society and every member and beneficiary of a member.

History.

(§ 5 ch 96 SLA 1997)